Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-260
Failure to hold fair; effect.

If an existing county agricultural society fails to hold a fair for at least three successive days, no money so levied for that year shall be paid to the use of such levy, but the same shall be paid into the general fund of the county and expended as other funds therein. Such money shall be paid by the county treasurer to the board of directors of such county agricultural society only after a sworn statement has been filed with the county clerk of such county, which statement shall be signed by the chairperson of the county agricultural society and shall set out when and where such county fair is to be held.

Laws 1881, c. 1, § 1, p. 64;

Laws 1889, c. 74, § 1, p. 535;

Laws 1901, c. 2, § 1, p. 44;

Laws 1905, c. 2, § 1, p. 53;

Laws 1913, c. 165, § 1, p. 509;

R.S.1913, § 6;

Laws 1915, c. 7, § 1, p. 56;

Laws 1917, c. 63, § 1, p. 164;

Laws 1921, c. 5, § 1, p. 67;

C.S.1922, § 6;

Laws 1925, c. 10, § 1, p. 78;

Laws 1927, c. 13, § 1, p. 97;

Laws 1929, c. 5, § 1, p. 72;

C.S.1929, § 2-201;

R.S.1943, § 2-204;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 2-204;

Laws 1997, LB 469, § 11.